District of Columbia statutes.
7-1709

Tobacco smoking education and smoking cessation programs.

The Mayor shall establish, in conjunction with the District of Columbia Commissioner of Public Health or any other agencies or departments of the District, a program to educate the general public on the issue of smoking and involuntary smoking, the health risks involved, and the requirements of this subchapter, explaining what the subchapter does and why it is important. The Mayor shall establish a smoking cessation program that provides free counseling, information, and whatever other assistance is deemed necessary by the District of Columbia Commissioner of Public Health for the purpose of assisting, upon request, persons residing in the District of Columbia to stop smoking tobacco products.

History

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-22, § 11
as added Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-100, § 2(i), 35 DCR 1182

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-919.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 3-22, the District of Columbia Smoking Restriction Act of 1979, see Mayor’s Order 90-192, December 13, 1990.